Connecticut, session 2026, SB00203.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the State Bond Commission be empowered to authorize the
issuance of bonds of the state in accordance with section 3-20 of the
general statutes, in principal amounts not exceeding in the aggregate
one million five hundred thousand dollars, in the fiscal year ending June
30, 2027, the proceeds of which shall be used by the Department of
Veterans Affairs for the purpose of upgrading technologies at various
town facilities and enabling the expansion of municipal veterans
services programs.